Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5757.
people of the state of michigan enact: Â  3. Definitions. Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Bona fide physician-patient relationship" means a treatment or counseling relationship between a physician and patient in which all of the following are present: (1) The physician has reviewed the patient's relevant medical records and completed a full assessment of the patient's medical history and current medical condition, including a relevant medical evaluation of the patient. (2) The physician has created and maintained records of the patient's condition in accord with medically accepted standards. (3) The physician has a reasonable expectation that he or she the physician will provide follow-up care to the patient to monitor the efficacy of the use of medical marihuana as a treatment of the patient's debilitating medical condition. (4) If the patient has given permission, the physician has notified the patient's primary care physician of the patient's debilitating medical condition and certification for the medical use of marihuana to treat that condition. (b) "Cannabis regulatory agency" means the marijuana regulatory agency created under Executive Reorganization Order No. 2019-2, MCL 333.27001, renamed the cannabis regulatory agency under Executive Reorganization Order No. 2022-1, MCL 333.27002. (c) (b) "Debilitating medical condition" means 1 or more of the following: (1) Cancer, glaucoma, positive status for human immunodeficiency virus, acquired immune deficiency syndrome, hepatitis C, amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, Crohn's disease, agitation of Alzheimer's disease, nail patella, or the treatment of these conditions. (2) A chronic or debilitating disease or medical condition or its treatment that produces 1 or more of the following: cachexia or wasting syndrome; severe and chronic pain; severe nausea; seizures, including, but not limited to, those characteristic of epilepsy; or severe and persistent muscle spasms, including, but not limited to, those characteristic of multiple sclerosis. (3) Any other medical condition or its treatment approved by the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency, as provided for in section 6(k). (d) (c) "Department" means the department of licensing and regulatory affairs.cannabis regulatory agency. (e) (d) "Enclosed, locked facility" means a closet, room, or other comparable, stationary, and fully enclosed area equipped with secured locks or other functioning security devices that permit access only by a registered primary caregiver or registered qualifying patient. Marihuana plants grown outdoors are considered to be in an enclosed, locked facility if they are not visible to the unaided eye from an adjacent property when viewed by an individual at ground level or from a permanent structure and are grown within a stationary structure that is enclosed on all sides, except for the base, by chain-link fencing, wooden slats, or a similar material that prevents access by the general public and that is anchored, attached, or affixed to the ground; located on land that is owned, leased, or rented by either the registered qualifying patient or a person designated through the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency's registration process as the primary caregiver for the registered qualifying patient or patients for whom the marihuana plants are grown; and equipped with functioning locks or other security devices that restrict access to only the registered qualifying patient or the registered primary caregiver who owns, leases, or rents the property on which the structure is located. Enclosed, locked facility includes a motor vehicle if both of the following conditions are met: (1) The vehicle is being used temporarily to transport living marihuana plants from 1 location to another with the intent to permanently retain those plants at the second location. (2) An individual is not inside the vehicle unless he or she the individual is either the registered qualifying patient to whom the living marihuana plants belong or the individual designated through the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency's registration process as the primary caregiver for the registered qualifying patient. (f) (e) "Marihuana" means that term as defined in section 3 of the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27953. (g) (f) "Marihuana-infused product" means a topical formulation, tincture, beverage, edible substance, or similar product containing any usable marihuana that is intended for human consumption in a manner other than smoke inhalation. Marihuana-infused product shall not be considered a food for purposes of the food law, 2000 PA 92, MCL 289.1101 to 289.8111. (h) (g) "Marihuana plant" means any plant of the species Cannabis sativa L. (h) "Marijuana regulatory agency" means the marijuana regulatory agency created under Executive Reorganization Order No. 2019-2, MCL 333.27001. (i) "Medical use of marihuana" means the acquisition, possession, cultivation, manufacture, extraction, use, internal possession, delivery, transfer, or transportation of marihuana, marihuana-infused products, or paraphernalia relating to the administration of marihuana to treat or alleviate a registered qualifying patient's debilitating medical condition or symptoms associated with the debilitating medical condition. (j) "Physician" means an individual licensed as a physician under part 170 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17001 to 333.17084, 333.17097, or an osteopathic physician under part 175 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.17501 to 333.17556. (k) "Plant" means any living organism that produces its own food through photosynthesis and has observable root formation or is in growth material. (l) "Primary caregiver" or "caregiver" means a person who is at least 21 years old and who has agreed to assist with a patient's medical use of marihuana and who has not been convicted of any felony within the past 10 years and has never been convicted of a felony involving illegal drugs or a felony that is an assaultive crime as defined in section 9a of chapter X of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 770.9a. (m) "Qualifying patient" or "patient" means a person who has been diagnosed by a physician as having a debilitating medical condition. (n) "Registry identification card" means a document issued by the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency that identifies a person as a registered qualifying patient or registered primary caregiver. (o) "Usable marihuana" means the dried leaves, flowers, plant resin, or extract of the marihuana plant, but does not include the seeds, stalks, and roots of the plant. (p) "Usable marihuana equivalent" means the amount of usable marihuana in a marihuana-infused product that is calculated as provided in section 4(c). (q) "Visiting qualifying patient" means a patient who is not a resident of this state or who has been a resident of this state for less than 30 days. (r) "Written certification" means a document signed by a physician, stating all of the following: (1) The patient's debilitating medical condition. (2) The physician has completed a full assessment of the patient's medical history and current medical condition, including a relevant medical evaluation. (3) In the physician's professional opinion, the patient is likely to receive therapeutic or palliative benefit from the medical use of marihuana to treat or alleviate the patient's debilitating medical condition or symptoms associated with the debilitating medical condition. Â  4. Protections for the Medical Use of Marihuana. Sec. 4. (a) A qualifying patient who has been issued and possesses a registry identification card is not subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business or occupational or professional licensing board or bureau, for the medical use of marihuana in accordance with this act, provided that the qualifying patient possesses an amount of marihuana that does not exceed a combined total of 2.5 ounces of usable marihuana and usable marihuana equivalents, and, if the qualifying patient has not specified that a primary caregiver will be allowed under state law to cultivate marihuana for the qualifying patient, 12 marihuana plants kept in an enclosed, locked facility. Any incidental amount of seeds, stalks, and unusable roots shall also be allowed under state law and shall not be included in this amount. The privilege from arrest under this subsection applies only if the qualifying patient presents both his or her the qualifying patient's registry identification card and a valid driver license or government-issued identification card that bears a photographic image of the qualifying patient. (b) A primary caregiver who has been issued and possesses a registry identification card is not subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business or occupational or professional licensing board or bureau, for assisting a qualifying patient to whom he or she the primary caregiver is connected through the department's cannabis regulatory agency's registration process with the medical use of marihuana in accordance with this act. The privilege from arrest under this subsection applies only if the primary caregiver presents both his or her the primary caregiver's registry identification card and a valid driver license or government-issued identification card that bears a photographic image of the primary caregiver. This subsection applies only if the primary caregiver possesses marihuana in forms and amounts that do not exceed any of the following: (1) For each qualifying patient to whom he or she the primary caregiver is connected through the department's cannabis regulatory agency's registration process, a combined total of 2.5 ounces of usable marihuana and usable marihuana equivalents. (2) For each registered qualifying patient who has specified that the primary caregiver will be allowed under state law to cultivate marihuana for the qualifying patient, 12 6 marihuana plants kept in an enclosed, locked facility. (3) Any incidental amount of seeds, stalks, and unusable roots. (c) For purposes of determining usable marihuana equivalency, the following shall be considered equivalent to 1 ounce of usable marihuana: (1) 16 ounces of marihuana-infused product if in a solid form. (2) 7 grams of marihuana-infused product if in a gaseous form. (3) 36 fluid ounces of marihuana-infused product if in a liquid form. (d) A person shall not be denied custody or visitation of a minor for acting in accordance with this act, unless the person's behavior is such that it creates an unreasonable danger to the minor that can be clearly articulated and substantiated. (e) There is a presumption that a qualifying patient or primary caregiver is engaged in the medical use of marihuana in accordance with this act if the qualifying patient or primary caregiver complies with both of the following: (1) Is in possession of a registry identification card. (2) Is in possession of an amount of marihuana that does not exceed the amount allowed under this act. The presumption may be rebutted by evidence that conduct related to marihuana was not for the purpose of alleviating the qualifying patient's debilitating medical condition or symptoms associated with the debilitating medical condition, in accordance with this act. (f) A registered primary caregiver may receive compensation for costs associated with assisting a registered qualifying patient in the medical use of marihuana. Any such compensation does not constitute the sale of controlled substances. (g) A physician shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by the Michigan board of medicine, the Michigan board of osteopathic medicine and surgery, or any other business or occupational or professional licensing board or bureau, solely for providing written certifications, in the course of a bona fide physician-patient relationship and after the physician has completed a full assessment of the qualifying patient's medical history, or for otherwise stating that, in the physician's professional opinion, a patient is likely to receive therapeutic or palliative benefit from the medical use of marihuana to treat or alleviate the patient's serious or debilitating medical condition or symptoms associated with the serious or debilitating medical condition, provided that nothing shall prevent a professional licensing board from sanctioning a physician for failing to properly evaluate a patient's medical condition or otherwise violating the standard of care for evaluating medical conditions. (h) A person shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business or occupational or professional licensing board or bureau, for providing a registered qualifying patient or a registered primary caregiver with marihuana paraphernalia for purposes of a qualifying patient's medical use of marihuana. (i) Any marihuana, marihuana paraphernalia, or licit property that is possessed, owned, or used in connection with the medical use of marihuana, as allowed under this act, or acts incidental to such use, shall not be seized or forfeited. (j) A person shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner, or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business or occupational or professional licensing board or bureau, solely for being in the presence or vicinity of the medical use of marihuana in accordance with this act, or for assisting a registered qualifying patient with using or administering marihuana. (k) A registry identification card, or its equivalent, that is issued under the laws of another state, district, territory, commonwealth, or insular possession of the United States that allows the medical use of marihuana by a visiting qualifying patient, or to allow a person to assist with a visiting qualifying patient's medical use of marihuana, shall have the same force and effect as a registry identification card issued by the department. cannabis regulatory agency. (l) Any registered qualifying patient or registered primary caregiver who sells marihuana to someone who is not allowed the medical use of marihuana under this act shall must have his or her the registered qualifying patient's or registered primary caregiver's registry identification card revoked and is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 2 years or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both, in addition to any other penalties for the distribution of marihuana. Any registered primary caregiver who cultivates more than the allowed number of marihuana plants must have the registered primary caregiver's registry identification card revoked. (m) A person shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or penalty in any manner or denied any right or privilege, including, but not limited to, civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business or occupational or professional licensing board or bureau, for manufacturing a marihuana-infused product if the person is any of the following: (1) A registered qualifying patient, manufacturing for his or her the registered qualifying patient's own personal use. (2) A registered primary caregiver, manufacturing for the use of a patient to whom he or she the primary caregiver is connected through the department's cannabis regulatory agency's registration process. (n) A qualifying patient shall not transfer a marihuana-infused product or marihuana to any individual. (o) A primary caregiver shall not transfer a marihuana-infused product to any individual who is not a qualifying patient to whom he or she the primary caregiver is connected through the department's cannabis regulatory agency's registration process. Â  6. Administering the Marijuana Cannabis Regulatory Agency's Rules. Sec. 6. (a) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall issue registry identification cards to qualifying patients who submit all of the following, in accordance with the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency's rules: (1) A written certification. (2) Application or renewal fee. (3) Name, address, and date of birth of the qualifying patient, except that if the applicant is homeless, no address is required. (4) Name, address, and telephone number of the qualifying patient's physician. (5) Name, address, and date of birth of the qualifying patient's primary caregiver, if any. (6) Proof of Michigan residency in this state. For the purposes of this subdivision, a person is considered to have proved legal residency in this state if any of the following apply: (i) The person provides a copy of a valid, lawfully obtained Michigan driver license issued under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, or an official state personal identification card issued under 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291 to 28.300. (ii) The person provides a copy of a valid Michigan voter registration.identification card prepared under section 499 of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.499 (7) If the qualifying patient designates a primary caregiver, a designation as to whether the qualifying patient or primary caregiver will be allowed under state law to possess marihuana plants for the qualifying patient's medical use. (b) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall not issue a registry identification card to a qualifying patient who is under the age of 18 unless all of the following conditions are met: (1) The qualifying patient's physician has explained the potential risks and benefits of the medical use of marihuana to the qualifying patient and to his or her the qualifying patient's parent or legal guardian. (2) The qualifying patient's parent or legal guardian submits a written certification from 2 physicians. (3) The qualifying patient's parent or legal guardian consents in writing to do all of the following: (A) Allow the qualifying patient's medical use of marihuana. (B) Serve as the qualifying patient's primary caregiver. (C) Control the acquisition of the marihuana, the dosage, and the frequency of the medical use of marihuana by the qualifying patient. (c) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall verify the information contained in an application or renewal submitted pursuant to this section, and shall approve or deny an application or renewal within not later than 15 business days after receiving it. The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency may deny an application or renewal only if the applicant did not provide the information required pursuant to this section, or if the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency determines that the information provided was falsified. Rejection of an application or renewal is considered a final marijuana cannabis regulatory agency action, subject to judicial review. Jurisdiction and venue for judicial review are vested in the circuit court for the county of Ingham. (d) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall issue a registry identification card to the primary caregiver, if any, who is named in a qualifying patient's approved application. However, each qualifying patient can have not more than 1 primary caregiver, the cannabis regulatory agency shall not issue a primary caregiver registry identification card to more than 1 individual per address, and a primary caregiver may assist not more than 5 qualifying patients with their medical use of marihuana. (e) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall issue registry identification cards within not later than 5 business days after approving an application or renewal. A registry identification card expires 2 years after the date it is issued. Registry identification cards must contain all of the following: (1) Name, address, and date of birth of the qualifying patient. (2) Name, address, and date of birth of the primary caregiver, if any, of the qualifying patient. (3) The date of issuance and expiration date of the registry identification card. (4) A random identification number. (5) A photograph, if the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency requires one by rule. (6) A clear designation showing whether the primary caregiver or the qualifying patient will be allowed under state law to possess the marihuana plants for the qualifying patient's medical use, which shall be determined based solely on the qualifying patient's preference. (f) If a registered qualifying patient's certifying physician notifies the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency in writing that the patient has ceased to suffer from a debilitating medical condition, the card becomes null and void upon notification by the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency to the patient. (g) Possession of, or application for, a registry identification card shall not constitute probable cause or reasonable suspicion, nor shall it be used to support the search of the person or property of the person possessing or applying for the registry identification card, or otherwise subject the person or property of the person to inspection by any local, county, or state governmental agency. (h) The following confidentiality rules apply: (1) Subject to subdivisions (3) and (4), applications and supporting information submitted by qualifying patients, including information regarding their primary caregivers and physicians, are confidential. (2) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall maintain a confidential list of the persons to whom the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency has issued registry identification cards. Except as provided in subdivisions (3) and (4), individual names and other identifying information on the list are confidential and are exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (3) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall verify to law enforcement personnel and to the necessary database created in the marihuana tracking act as established by the medical marihuana facilities licensing act whether a registry identification card is valid, without disclosing more information than is reasonably necessary to verify the authenticity of the registry identification card. (4) A person, including an employee, contractor, or official of the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency or another state agency or local unit of government, who discloses confidential information in violation of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 6 months or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. Notwithstanding this provision, marijuana cannabis regulatory agency employees may notify law enforcement about falsified or fraudulent information submitted to the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency. (i) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall submit to the legislature an annual report that does not disclose any identifying information about qualifying patients, primary caregivers, or physicians, but does contain, at a minimum, all of the following information: (1) The number of applications filed for registry identification cards. (2) The number of qualifying patients and primary caregivers approved in each county. (3) The nature of the debilitating medical conditions of the qualifying patients. (4) The number of registry identification cards revoked. (5) The number of physicians providing written certifications for qualifying patients. (j) The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency may enter into a contract with a private contractor to assist the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency in performing its duties under this section. The contract may provide for assistance in processing and issuing registry identification cards, but the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall retain the authority to make the final determination as to issuing the registry identification card. Any contract must include a provision requiring the contractor to preserve the confidentiality of information in conformity with subsection (h). (k) Not later than 6 months after April 1, 2013, the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall appoint a panel to review petitions to approve medical conditions or treatments for addition to the list of debilitating medical conditions under the rules. The panel shall meet at least twice 2 times each year and shall review and make a recommendation to the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency concerning any petitions that have been submitted that are completed and include any documentation required by rule. All of the following apply to the panel: (1) A majority of the panel members must be licensed physicians, and the panel shall provide recommendations to the marijuana cannabis regulatory agency regarding whether the petitions should be approved or denied. (2) All meetings of the panel are subject to the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (l) The marihuana registry fund is created within the state treasury. All fees collected under this act shall be deposited into the fund. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year must remain in the fund and must not lapse to the general fund. The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall be the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. The marijuana cannabis regulatory agency shall expend money from the fund, upon appropriation, for the operation and oversight of the Michigan medical marihuana program. For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2016, $8,500,000.00 is appropriated from the marihuana registry fund to the department for its initial costs of implementing the medical marihuana facilities licensing act and the marihuana tracking act. For the fiscal year ending September 30, 2021, $24,000,000.00 of the money in the marihuana registry fund is transferred to and must be deposited into the Michigan set aside fund created under section 1i of 1965 PA 213, MCL 780.621i. (m) As used in this section, "marijuana regulatory agency" means the marijuana regulatory agency created under Executive Reorganization Order No. 2019-2, MCL 333.27001.